src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_EHYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 43 front
!!€  ehyt: ehyt+A+Sg+Nom # unbroken
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Lexicalised nut-participles
!!  Majority of lexicalised nut participles are adjectives.

LEXICON ADJ_KULUNUT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 back
!!€  kulunut: kulunut+A+Sg+Nom # used
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ut  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 47 front
!!€  ällistynyt: ällistynyt+A+Sg+Nom # amazed
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:yt  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ee  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Old -e^ final stems

LEXICON ADJ_AHNE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 back
!!€  ahne: ahne+A+Sg+Nom # greedy
0  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

:he  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE_ARCHAIC  ;


LEXICON ADJ_TERVE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 front
!!€  terve: terve+A+Sg+Nom # healthy
0  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!
LEXICON ADJ_KADE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 d~t back
!!€  kade: kade+A+Sg+Nom # jealous
0:de  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:det  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:de  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HELLE
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 48 l~t back
!!€  helle: helle+A+Sg+Nom # warm weather
0:le  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:let  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:tee  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:te  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:te  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

!!  Gapping almost all variants of gradations with e, as well as all dual
!!  nominative stems.

!!  !Exceptional adjectives
!!  The ones that do not fit in the official classes shown in dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_PITKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective pitkä
!!€  pitkä: pitkä+A+Sg+Nom
!!€  pidempi: pitkä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pisin: pitkä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tkä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:tk  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:de  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:s  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PARAS

0:a  ADJ_BACK_H_PLURALS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:aha  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS_ARCHAIC  ;

0:as  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:as  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:as  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:haa  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:haa  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;

0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ha  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ha  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_OIKEE
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:e  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:e  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;
0:e  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

:e  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_AINUT
!! THE EPSILON-to-ZILCH SEEMS TO INTERFER WITH COMPILATION 2015-08-23, Jaska
!! 0:  >> 0:0 SO TOMMI FINDS THEM
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

0:t  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA  ;
0:t  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

0:u  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:u  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN  ;


!!  !Plurales tantum?
!!  Adjectives aren't typically plural words, but there are some in the
!!  dictionaries.

LEXICON ADJ_LEUATTOMAT
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective plurales
!!€  leuattomat: leuattomat+A+Pl+Nom # ?
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
+Use/NG:on  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:toma  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:tom  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;



LEXICON ADJ_KOLMAS

:n	ADJ_BACK_ESSIVE_NA_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_BACK_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

LEXICON ADJ_NELJÄS

:n	ADJ_FRONT_ESSIVE_NÄ_ARCHAIC ;

:nne	ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:ns	ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:nte	ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS ;

:s	ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;

:t	ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;





!! !!Adjective inflection proper



LEXICON ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE
!! The superlative derivation is formed by in suffix, which creates a new
!! adjective baseform. This baseform is handled separately to avoid double
!! superlatives.
!!€gt-norm: Adjective superlative front
!!€ rumin: ruma+A+Superl+Sg+Nom # ugliest
+Superl:»i  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE_STEMS ;


LEXICON ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Adjective superlative back
!!€ tyhmin: tyhmä+A+Superl+Sg+Nom # stupidest
+Superl:»i  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE_STEMS ;

LEXICON ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE
!! The comparative derivation is formed by mpi suffix, which creates a new
!! adjective baseform. This adjective is handled separately
!! to avoid double comparative forms.
!!€gt-norm: Adjective comparative front
!!€ rumempi: ruma+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
+Comp:»m     ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE_STEMS ;

LEXICON ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE
!!€gt-norm: Adjective comparative back
!!€ tyhmempi: tyhmä+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
+Comp:»m     ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE_STEMS ;
