src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
ahne+A:ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
ainut+A:ainu  ADJ_AINUT  ;
aivokuollut+A:aivokuoll  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
asettunut+A:asettun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
ehtynyt+A:ehtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ehyt+A:ehy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
eloonjäänyt+A:eloonjääny  ADJ_EHYT  ;
elähtänyt+A:elähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
epäonnistunut+A:epäonnistun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
erääntynyt+A:erääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
haavoittunut+A:haavoittun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
murentunut+A:halvaantun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
harmaantunut+A:harmaantun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
helle+A:hel  ADJ_HELLE  ;
hengästynyt+A:hengästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
henkiinjäänyt+A:henkiinjääny  ADJ_EHYT  ;
hienostunut+A:hienostun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
hiiltynyt+A:hiiltyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hurmaantunut+A:hurmaantun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
häikäistynyt+A:häikäistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
hämmästynyt+A:hämmästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
höpsähtänyt+A:höpsähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
höyhenenkevyt+A:höyhenenkevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
höyhenenkevyt+A:höyhenen#kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
iki-ihastunut+A:iki-ihastun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
itkettynyt+A:itkettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
itseoppinut+A:itseoppin  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
jälleensyntynyt+A:jälleensyntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
järkyttynyt+A:järkyttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kaasuttunut+A:kaasuttun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kade+A:ka  ADJ_KADE  ;
kahdeksas+A:kahdeksa  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
kangistunut+A:kangistun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
katkeroitunut+A:katkeroitun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kehittynyt+A:kehittyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kevyt+A:kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
kieroutunut+A:kieroutun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kiihtynyt+A:kiihtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kivettynyt+A:kivettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kokenut+A:koken  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kolmas+A:kolma  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
kotiutunut+A:kotiutun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kulunut+A:kulun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kuolemanväsynyt+A:kuoleman#väsyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
kutistunut+A:kutistun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
kuudes+A:kuude  ADJ_KOLMAS  ;
kymmenes+A:kymmene  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
kärventynyt+A:kärventyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
lamautunut+A:lamautun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
leuattomat+A:leuat  ADJ_LEUATTOMAT  ;
levännyt+A:levänn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
liikakuormittunut+A:liika#kuormittun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
litistynyt+A:litistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
lopettanut+A:lopettan  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
lupautunut+A:lupautun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
lyhyt+A:lyhy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
menettänyt+A:menettän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
motivoitunut+A:motivoitun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
mykistynyt+A:mykistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
nainut+A:nain  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
neljäs+A:neljä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
näivettynyt+A:näivettyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
oikee+A:oike  ADJ_OIKEE  ;
oikee+A:oike  ADJ_OIKEE  ;
oppinut+A:oppin  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
paksuuntunut+A:paksuuntun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
paras+A:par  ADJ_PARAS  ;
pehmyt+A:pehmy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
pelästynyt+A:pelästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pidentynyt+A:pidentyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
piirtynyt+A:piirtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pimahtanut+A:pimahtan  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
pitkä+A:pi  ADJ_PITKÄ  ;
pitkästynyt+A:pitkästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pumpulinkevyt+A:pumpulinkevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
pumpulinkevyt+A:pumpulin#kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
punertunut+A:punertun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
päihtynyt+A:päihtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
pöllämystynyt+A:pöllämystyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
raakile+A:raakile  ADJ_AHNE  ;
rahanahne+A:rahan#ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
rahanahne+A:rahanahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
rapistunut+A:rapistun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
repale+A:repale  ADJ_AHNE  ;
riisuutunut+A:riisuutun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
routaantunut+A:routaantun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
ränsistynyt+A:ränsistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
samentanut+A:samentan  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
seitsemäs+A:seitsemä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
selvinnyt+A:selvinn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
stigmatisoitunut+A:stigmatisoitun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
sykähtynyt+A:sykähtyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
säikähtänyt+A:säikähtän  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
terve+A:terve  ADJ_TERVE  ;
tiine+A:tiine  ADJ_TERVE  ;
toimeksisaanut+A:toimeksisaan  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
tuore+A:tuore  ADJ_AHNE  ;
tyydyttynyt+A:tyydyttyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
täysinpalvellut+A:täysinpalvell  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
ultrakevyt+A:ultrakevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
ultrakevyt+A:ultra#kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
ultralyhyt+A:ultralyhy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
ultralyhyt+A:ultra#lyhy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
untuvankevyt+A:untuvankevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
untuvankevyt+A:untuvan#kevy  ADJ_EHYT  ;
uudelleensyntynyt+A:uudelleensyntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
valmistautunut+A:valmistautun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
vihastunut+A:vihastun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
viides+A:viide  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
viivästynyt+A:viivästyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
vääntynyt+A:vääntyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
yhdeksäs+A:yhdeksä  ADJ_NELJÄS  ;
yliahne+A:yli#ahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
yliahne+A:yliahne  ADJ_AHNE  ;
yliherkistynyt+A:yli#herkistyn  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
ylikuormittunut+A:ylikuormittun  ADJ_KULUNUT  ;
pehmennyt+A:pehmen  ADJ_ÄLLISTYNYT  ;
